Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 146 Natural Resources

146.010.
Functions. [Repealed.]

146.020.
Organization of department — Divisions. [Repealed.]

146.025.
Conservation board — Functions — Members, appointment, qualifications, terms. [Repealed.]

146.030.
Division of Game and Fish. [Repealed.]

146.040.
Division of Parks. [Repealed.]

146.050.
Division of forestry. [Repealed.]

146.060.
Division of Publicity. [Repealed.]

146.070.
Division of Archaeology. [Repealed.]

146.080.
Division of Conservation — Components — Functions.

There is hereby created, within the Department for Natural Resources in the Energy and Environment Cabinet, a Division of Conservation. The division shall consist of a Soil and Water Conservation Commission, a director, and such officers, employees, and agents as the commission may deem necessary for carrying out the function of the division, through the commission and the director, to assist soil and water conservation districts and watershed conservancy districts organized under KRS Chapter 262 in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties conferred upon them by such chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 52, § 1; 1966, ch. 23, § 55; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(1); 2010, ch. 24, § 117, effective July 15, 2010.

146.090.
Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, with the approval of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall divide the state into nine (9) soil and water conservation areas which shall contain as nearly as practicable, an equal number of soil and water conservation districts;

The Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall consist of nine (9) members, not more than five (5) of whom shall be of the same political party, to be appointed by the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet with the approval of the Governor;

One (1) member shall be appointed from each of the areas from a list of two (2) names submitted from each area by the supervisors of the soil and water conservation districts that have their principal offices therein. All members shall be supervisors of soil and water conservation districts;

The term of office of each member shall be four (4) years; provided that, whenever a member of the commission ceases to hold the office of district supervisor by virtue of which he is serving on the commission, his term of office as a member of the commission shall be terminated. In the case of any vacancy other than the one (1) caused by the expiration of a term, the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, with the approval of the Governor, shall appoint the successor from a list of two (2) names submitted by the supervisors of the soil and water conservation area which was represented by the former member. The successor shall also be a supervisor of a soil and water conservation district;

The members of the commission shall designate a chairman from among their members and may from time to time change such designation. The commission shall keep a record of its official actions. A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum. The commission may call upon the Attorney General for legal services as it may require. It may delegate to its chairman, any of its members, the director of the division, or any officer, employee, or agent, powers and duties as it deems proper. Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be entitled to expenses, including traveling expenses, necessarily incurred in discharging their duties;

The following persons are advisory members of the commission by virtue of their offices: the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, the Commissioner of Agriculture, the director of the agricultural experiment station, the director of vocational education, and the state conservationist of the United States Department of Agriculture.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 52, § 2; 1952, ch. 202; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. VII, § 13; 1960, ch. 68, Art. XIV, § 1; 1966, ch. 23, § 56; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(1); 1984, ch. 111, § 80, effective July 13, 1984; 2010, ch. 24, § 118, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

146.100.
Director of Division of Conservation — Qualifications — Compensation — Powers — Duties.

The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, with the approval of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall appoint a director of the Division of Conservation with experience in professional agricultural activities and who shall serve as executive officer for the commission. The director shall serve at the will of, and receive compensation as may be determined by the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet with the advice of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission. In addition to any other duties assigned to him or herby the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, the director shall exercise, subject to the approval of the secretary, general administrative supervision over all activities, employees and property of the commission;

The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet may employ other officers, employees, and agents, who shall serve at his or her will as he or she deems necessary, with the advice of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, and shall provide for surety bonds for members, the director, officers, employees or agents if entrusted with funds or property.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 52, § 3; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. VII, § 14; 1960, ch. 68, Art. XIV, § 2; 1966, ch. 23, § 57; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(1); 2010, ch. 24, § 119, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

146.110.
Powers and functions of Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

The commission shall have the general power to take any action it may consider necessary or proper to assist soil and water conservation districts, agricultural districts, or watershed conservancy districts in carrying out their functions, powers, duties, and programs in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 262, and for such purpose it may furnish financial and other aid to the districts and perform such services for them at their request as may be possible under available appropriations and resources;

The commission has all the powers and duties formerly possessed by the State Soil Conservation Committee;

The commission shall take any action it may consider necessary or proper in order to discharge for the state any of the state’s functions, responsibilities, or duties relating to flood control, drainage, and other activities with respect to the conservation, utilization, or control of soil or water resources;

The commission may request the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet to promulgate those administrative regulations as may be necessary to the performance of its duties and may enter into and execute any agreements or legal instruments that may be necessary for these purposes, and the commission shall have the authority to acquire necessary supplies, materials, and equipment, and warehousing, servicing, and maintenance facilities for equipment.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 52, § 4; 1960, ch. 68, Art. XIV, § 3; 1966, ch. 23, § 58; 1994, ch. 241, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 117, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

146.115.
Kentucky soil erosion and water quality cost-share fund — Uses — Administrative regulations.

There is established the “Kentucky Soil Erosion and Water Quality Cost-Share Fund” to be administered by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission. Moneys from the fund shall be used for cost-share programs to provide financial assistance for implementation of best management practices for the following purposes:

Providing cleaner water through the reduction in sediment loading of Kentucky streams, rivers, and lakes;

Reducing the loss of topsoil vital to the sustained production of food and fiber; and

Preventing surface water and groundwater pollution.

The commission is empowered to promulgate administrative regulations establishing practices eligible for cost-sharing funds, prioritizing applications, and prescribing amounts and limits of cost sharing. Practices eligible for cost-sharing funds shall include agricultural and silvicultural practices. Local conservation districts shall determine the eligibility of persons to receive the funds allocated to the districts by the commission. Priority for funding within each local conservation district shall be given to animal waste management systems, where animal waste has been identified as a water pollution problem, and to members of an agricultural district.

Any person engaged in agricultural or silvicultural production may be considered for funding under this section if the person has had prepared a soil and water conservation plan with the local conservation district, has had prepared a forest management or forest stewardship plan, or has had prepared a groundwater protection plan and agrees to maintain best management practices for a period of time specified by the commission.

Up to five percent (5%) of any total annual appropriation may be used for administrative costs of the local conservation districts and the commission.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 390, § 34, effective July 15, 1994.

146.120.
KRS 146.080 to 146.110 are in addition to other laws. [Repealed.]

146.121.
Kentucky soil erosion and water quality cost-share fund. [Renumbered by merger into KRS 146.115.]

146.130.
Division of Recreation. [Repealed.]

146.131.
Cabinet’s duty to transmit information concerning abandonment of railroad corridors to the Kentucky Department of Parks and to the Railtrail Development Office.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet, including any agency or other unit of government attached to the cabinet, shall immediately transmit to the Kentucky Department of Parks and to the Commonwealth’s Railtrail Development Office in the Department for Local Government any information received from a railroad or other person having an ownership interest in a railroad corridor pertaining to a proposed or pending action or proceeding to obtain federal authority for the regulatory abandonment of that railroad corridor.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 338, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 120, effective July 15, 2010.

146.140.
Functions of division. [Repealed.]

146.150.
State Recreation Board. [Repealed.]

146.160.
Director of Recreation. [Repealed.]